zh-TW: 灑水器類型: 噴水口; 大砲型; 中心樞軸; 滴灌型; 固定噴霧; 齒輪驅動馬達; 軟管末端; 衝擊式; 噴霧; 擺動式; 快開式噴霧; 可攜式; 脈衝式; 旋轉式; 滲水管; 固定式; 移動式; 三腳架; 斜盤式; 其他
sv: Sprinklertyp: Bubblare; Kanon; Centrumvridpunkt; Droppavgivare; Fast spray; Kugghjulsdriven rotor; Slangände; Påverkan; Imma; Oscillerande; popup-butik spray; Bärbar; Pulserande; Roterande; Blötläggare; Stationär; Resande; Stativ; Vingla; Annat
nb: Sprinklertype: Bobler; Kanon; Senterdreiepunkt; Drypputskiller; Fast spray; Girdrevet rotor; Slangeende; innvirkning; Dugging; Oscillerende; pop-up-butikkspray; Bærbar; Pulserende; Roterende; Dryppslange; Stasjonær; Reising; Stativ; Vingling; Annet
nl: Type sproeier: Bubbler; Sproeikanon; Cirkelberegening; Druppelaar; Vaste sproeikop; Tandwielaangedreven rotor; Slangsproeier; Impact; Verneveling; Oscillerend; Pop-ups sproeier; Draagbaar; Pulserend; Roterend; Zweetslang; Stationair; Reizen; Statief; Wiebelen; Overig
pl: Typ zraszacza: Bąbelkowy; Działko wodne; Centralny pivot; Emiter kroplowy; Stały natrysk; Rotor przekładniowy; Na końcówkę węża; Uderzeniowe; Zraszanie mgiełkowe; Oscylacyjne; Wysuwany natrysk; Przenośne; Pulsujące; Rotacyjne; Kroplujące; Stacjonarne; Jeżdżące; Na trójnogu; Oscylacyjny chwiejny; Inne
sk-SK: Typ postrekovača: Bublinkový; Veľký rotačný; So stredovým otočným čapom; Kvapkací; Pevný rozstrek; Rotačný s ozumeným pohonom; S upevňovaním na koniec hadice; Nárazový; Mikrorozprašovací; Oscilačný; Vysúvací rozstrekovač; Prenosný; Pulzný; Rotačný; Namáčací; Stacionárny; Pohyblivý; Statický; Kolísavý; Iné
el: Τύπος εκτοξευτήρα: Φυσαλίδα; Κανόνι; Κεντρικός άξονας; Εκπομπός σταγόνων; Σταθερός ψεκασμός; Ρότορας με γρανάζια; Άκρο σωλήνα; Εκτοξευτήρας νερού; Ομίχλη; Ταλαντευόμενος; κατάστημα pop-up spray; Φορητός; Παλμικός; Περιστροφικός; Soaker; Σταθερός; Αυτοκινούμενος; Σε τρίποδα; Κουνιέμαι; Άλλο
ja: スプリンクラーの種類: バブラー; キャノン; センターピボット; ドリップエミッター; 固定スプレー; ギア駆動ローター; ホースエンド; インパクト; ミスト; 回転式; ポップアップスプレー; ポータブル; パルス式; 回転式; 浸透ホース; 固定; 移動式; 三脚; ウォブル; その他
fi: Sadettimen tyyppi: Bubbler; Tykki; Keskinivel; Tippusuutin; Kiinteä suihku; Vaihdekäyttöinen roottori; Letkun päähän asennettava; Impakti; Sumutus; Oskilloiva; Nouseva sadetin; Siirrettävä; Sykkivä; Pyörivä; Tihkuttava; Paikallaan oleva; Matkailu; Kolmijalka; Heiluva; Muu
vi: Loại vòi phun nước: Đầu phun sủi bọt; Súng phun nước; Trục xoay trung tâm; Đầu tưới nhỏ giọt; Phun cố định; Bộ xoay dẫn động bằng bánh răng; Đầu vòi ống dẫn; In kim; Phun sương; Dao động; Đầu phun tự nhô lên; Xách tay; Xung động; Xoay; Vòi tưới nhỏ giọt; Để một chỗ; Đi du lịch; Giá ba chân; Lắc lư; Khác
es: Tipo de aspersor: Burbujeador; Cañón; Pivote central; Emisor de goteo; Rociador fijo; Rotor accionado por engranajes; Extremo de la manguera; Impacto; Nebulización; Oscilante; Aerosol desplegable; Portátil; Pulsante; Giratoria; Irrigador; Fijo; Viaje; Trípode; Giratorio; Otros
pt-PT: Tipo de aspersor: Borbulhador; Canhão; Pivô central; Gotejador; Spray fixo; Rotor acionado por engrenagem; Extremidade da mangueira; Impacto; Nebulização; Oscilante; Pulverizador retrátil; Portátil; Pulsátil; Rotativo; Regador; Fixo; Móvel; Tripé; Oscilação; Outro
zh-CN: 喷洒器类型: 涌泉式; 大炮式; 中心枢轴式; 滴灌器; 固定喷雾; 齿轮驱动旋转; 软管末端; 冲击式; 喷雾; 摆动式; 弹升式喷雾; 便携式; 脉动式; 旋转式; 渗水式; 固定式; 移动式; 三脚架; 摇臂式; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta prskalice: Raspršivač mjehurića; Topovski raspršivač; Centralni okretaj; Kapaljka; Fiksni raspršivač; Rotacijski raspršivač sa zupčanim pogonom; Kraj crijeva; Udar; Raspršivač maglice; Oscilirajuća; Izlazni sprej; Prijenosni; Pulsirajuća; Rotacijska; Namakanje; Stacionarno; Putovanje; Tronožac; Oscilirajući; Ostalo
it: Tipo di irrigatore: Bubbler; Cannone; Perno centrale; Emettitore a goccia; Spray fisso; Rotore a ingranaggi; Estremità del tubo flessibile; Impatto; Nebulizzazione; Oscillante; Spray pop-up; Portatile; Pulsante; A rotazione; Tubo poroso; Stazionario; In viaggio; Treppiedi; Oscillante; Altro
tr: Sprinkler başlığı tipi: Fıskiye tipi; Top tipi; Merkez pivotlu; Damla emitörü; Sabit püskürtme; Dişli tahrikli rotor; Hortum ucu; Darbeli; Sisleme; Salınımlı; Açılır (pop-up) püskürtme; Taşınabilir; Titreşimli; Döner; Sızdırma; Sabit; Gezici; Tripod; Salınımlı; Diğer
fr: Type d’arroseur: Bubbler; Canon; Pivot central; Émetteur goutte à goutte; Jet fixe; Rotor à engrenages; Extrémité du tuyau; Impact; Brumisation; Oscillante; Jet escamotable; Portable; Pulsatile; Rotatif; Tuyau poreux; Stationnaire; Voyager; Trépied; Oscillant; Autre
ro-RO: Tip de aspersor: Bubbler; Tun; Pivot central; Emițător de picături; Pulverizare fixă; Rotor acționat de roți dințate; Capăt de furtun; Impact; Ceață; Oscilant; Pulverizare pop-up; Portabil; Pulsativ; Rotativ; De udare; Staționar; Mobil; Cu trepied; Oscilant; Altele
bg-BG: Тип пръскачка: Бълбукащо; Струйно разпръскване; Централно завъртане; Капково устройство; Фиксирано разпръскване; Ротор със зъбен механизъм; Дюза на маркуч; Импактни; Мъгла; Осцилиращи; Изкачащо; Преносимо; Пулсиращи; Ротационни; За просмукване; Стационарен; Самоходен; На тринога; С клатещо се рамо; Друго
da: Sprinklertype: Bobler; Kanon; Centerdrejepunkt; Drypudleder; Fast spray; Tandhjulsdrevet rotor; Slangeende; Kontakt; Dug; Oscillerende; Pop-op-spray; Transportabel; Pulserende; Roterende; Soaker; Stationær; Rejser; Stativ; Wobble; Andet
en: Sprinkler type: Bubbler; Cannon; Center pivot; Drip emitter; Fixed spray; Gear-driven rotor; Hose-end; Impact; Misting; Oscillating; Pop-up spray; Portable; Pulsating; Rotary; Soaker; Stationary; Traveling; Tripod; Wobble; Other
lt-LT: Purkštuvo tipas: Burbuliatorius; Patranka; Centrinis sukimasis; Lašelinis skleidėjas; Fiksuotas purškimas; Krumpliaračiais varomas rotorius; Žarnos galas; Smūginis; Rūkas; Osciliuojantis; Iššokantis purkštuvas; Nešiojamas; Pulsuojantis; Rotacinis; Lašinamasis; Stacionarus; Kelioninis; Trikojis; Svyravimas; Kita
cs: Typ postřikovače: Bubbler; Dělový; Pivotový; Kapkový; Statický; Rotační; Na konec hadice; Úderové; Mlžicí; Oscilační; Výsuvný; Přenosné; Pulzní; Rotační; Průsakové; Stacionární; Pojezdové; Stativové; Výkyvný; Jiné
th: ประเภทของหัวฉีดน้ำ: แบบฟองหรือละอองเล็กๆ; พ่นน้ำในระยะไกล; แบบหมุนศูนย์กลาง; หัวจ่ายน้ำแบบหยด; สเปรย์แบบคงที่; โรเตอร์ขับเคลื่อนด้วยเกียร์; ปลายสายยาง; แบบกระแทก; พ่นละอองน้ำ; หมุนสลับ; แบบป๊อปอัพ; แบบพกพา; สั่นพัลส์; โรตารี; แบบซึม; แบบอยู่กับที่; แบบเดินทาง; แบบสามขา; แบบแกว่ง; อื่นๆ
ru: Форма спринклера: Пузырьковый; Пушка; С центральной осью; Капельница; Фиксированное распыление; Ротор с зубчатой передачей; На конце шланга; Импульсный; Водяной туман; Осциллирующий; Выдвижной распылитель; Переносной; Пульсирующий; Роторный; Сочащийся; Стационарный; Самоходный; На треноге; Качающийся; Другой
hu: Öntöző típus: Buborékoló; Vízágyú; Központi forgó; Csepegtető; Rögzített permetező; Fogaskerék-hajtású rotor; Tömlővég; Forgó; Párásító; Oszcilláló; Süllyesztett öntözőfej; Hordozható; Pulzáló; Forgó; Áztató; Rögzített; Mobil; Állvány; Billegő; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de aspersor: Borbulhador; Canhão; Pivô central; Emissor de gotejamento; Spray fixo; Rotor acionado por engrenagem; Extremidade da mangueira; Impacto; Nebulização; Oscilatória; Spray retrátil; Portátil; Pulsante; Rotativo; Mangueira de irrigação por gotejamento; Estacionário; Viagem; Tripé; Oscilação; Outro
de: Sprinklertyp: Bubbler; Regenkanone; Pivot-Beregnung; Tropfenbewässerung; Feststehender Sprühregen; Getrieberegner; Schlauchende; Druckkraft; Vernebelung; Oszillierend; Versenkregner; Tragbar; Pulsierend; Rotierend; Tropfer; Stationär; Reisen; Dreibeinstativ; Woobler; Sonstiges
ko: 스프링클러 유형: 버블러; 캐논; 센터 피벗; 점적기; 고정형 스프레이; 기어 구동식 로터; 호스 연결형; 임팩트; 안개형; 진동; 팝업 스프레이; 이동식; 펄세이팅; 회전; 흡수식; 고정식; 여행; 삼각대; 워블; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta razpršilnika: Mehurčkalnik; Top; Sredinski vrtilni mehanizem; Oddajnik kapljanja; Fiksni sprej; Rotor z zobniškim pogonom; Konec cevi; Impact; Meglenje; Oscilirajoče; Pojavni sprej; Prenosno; Pulzirajoče; Krožna; Soaker; Stacionarni; Potovanje; Stativ; Nihanje; Druga